Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-17] Jurisdiction declined by reason
of conduct. (a) If at any time a court of the State of Hawaii determines
that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order
because of unjustifiable conduct, the court may:

(1) Decline to exercise jurisdiction;

(2) Exercise jurisdiction for the limited purpose of
fashioning an appropriate remedy to ensure the health, safety, and welfare of
the respondent or the protection of the respondent's property or prevent a
repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the proceeding until
a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order
is filed in a court of another state having jurisdiction; or

(3) Continue to exercise jurisdiction after considering:

(A) The extent to which the respondent and
all persons required to be notified of the proceedings have acquiesced in the
exercise of the court's jurisdiction;

(B) Whether it is a more appropriate forum
than the court of any other state under the factors set forth in section
551G-16(c); and

(C) Whether the court of any other state
would have jurisdiction under factual circumstances in substantial conformity
with the jurisdictional standards of section 551G-13.

(b) If a court of the State of Hawaii
determines that it acquired jurisdiction to appoint a guardian or issue a
protective order because a party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction engaged in
unjustifiable conduct, it may assess against that party necessary and
reasonable expenses, including attorney's fees, investigative fees, court
costs, communication expenses, witness fees and expenses, and travel expenses.
The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses of any kind against the State
of Hawaii or a governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the
State of Hawaii unless authorized by law other than this chapter. [L 2012, c
236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next